California statutes. Education Code
(e) If an enrolled 18-year-old pupil reaches age 19 without earning a high school diploma or its equivalent, the pupil may be enrolled for one additional semester if the pupil has been continuously enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program since before his or her 19th birthday.

(f) Pupils receiving services under Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code are eligible for services under this chapter. Child care provided under this article shall be the primary source of child care for these recipients when participating in a Cal-SAFE program operated by school districts or county superintendents of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 45.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

54748.

The duties of the State Department of Education include all of the following:

(a) Provision of technical assistance, focused upon transition into the Cal-SAFE program, to school districts and county superintendents of schools currently operating a School Age Parent and Infant Development Program, a Pregnant Minors Program, or a Pregnant and Lactating Students Program, or any combination thereof.

(b) Provision of technical assistance to school districts and county superintendents of schools that do not currently operate a School Age Parent and Infant Development Program, a Pregnant Minors Program, or a Pregnant and Lactating Students Program as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 54745.

(c) Identification and sharing of information on best practices across program sites.

(d) Development of benchmarks to determine to what degree pupils and children enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program attain the program goals.

(e) Consultation with local education agency representatives and others, as appropriate, to develop strategies for implementation of the Cal-SAFE program.

(f) Determination of areas in the state where there are pupils who are most in need or pupils who are least likely to access services on their own if there are not enough resources to serve all eligible pupils.

(g) Development of an application process and approval of local education agencies to implement a Cal-SAFE program.

(h) Development of operating guidelines for implementing an effective Cal-SAFE program.

(i) Development of guidelines for fiscal reporting.

(j) Coordination with other state agencies that administer teen pregnancy prevention and intervention programs.

(k) Development of procedures to conduct program evaluation and monitoring, as appropriate.

(l) Commencing March 1, 2005, and every five years thereafter, preparation and submission of a report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature. The report shall include data, analysis of data, and an evaluation of the Cal-SAFE program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 71, Sec. 24.   Effective July 5, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

54749.

(a) For the 2000-01 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, a school district or county superintendent of schools participating in Cal-SAFE is eligible for state funding from funds appropriated for services provided for the purposes of the program as follows:

(1) A support services allowance of two thousand two hundred thirty-seven dollars ($2,237) for each unit of average daily attendance generated by each pupil who has completed the intake process pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 54746 and is receiving services pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 54746. This allowance shall be adjusted annually by the inflation factor set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1. In no event shall more than one support service allowance be generated by any pupil concurrently enrolled in more than one educational program.

(A) A support services allowance may not be claimed for units of average daily attendance reported pursuant to the following:

(i) Subdivision (b) of Section 1982 for pupils attending county community schools operated pursuant to Chapter 6.5 of Part 2 (commencing with Section 1980).

(ii) Pupils attending juvenile court schools operated pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27.

(iii) Pupils attending community day schools operated pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 48660) of Chapter 4 of Part 27.

(iv) Pupils attending a county operated Cal-SAFE program pursuant to this article whose attendance is reported pursuant to Section 2551.3.

(B) A support services allowance may not be used to supplant average daily attendance and revenue limit funding provided pursuant to paragraph (2) for the support of educational programs that Cal-SAFE program pupils attend.

(2) Average daily attendance and revenue limit funding for pupils receiving services in the Cal-SAFE program shall be computed pursuant to provisions and regulations applicable to the educational program or programs that each pupil attends, except as provided in paragraph (3).

(3) For attendance not claimed pursuant to paragraph (2), a county office of education may claim the statewide average revenue limit per unit of average daily attendance for high school districts, payable from Section A of the State School Fund, for the attendance of pupils receiving services in the Cal-SAFE program, provided that no other revenue limit funding is claimed for the same pupil and pupil attendance of no less than 240 minutes per day and is computed and maintained pursuant to Section 46300.

(4) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 54749.5, operators of Cal-SAFE programs shall be reimbursed in accordance with the amount specified in subdivision (b) of Section 8265 and the amounts specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 8265.5 for each child receiving services pursuant to the Cal-SAFE program who is the child of teen parents enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program. To be eligible for funding pursuant to this paragraph, the operational days of child care and development programs are only those necessary to provide child care services to children of pupils participating in Cal-SAFE.

(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), pupils for whom attendance is reported pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1982, pupils attending juvenile court schools, and pupils attending community day schools may complete the intake process for the Cal-SAFE program and, if the intake process is completed, shall receive services pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 54746. The children of pupils receiving services in the Cal-SAFE program pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 54746 and attending juvenile court schools, county community schools, or community day schools are eligible for funding pursuant to paragraph (4) and no other provisions of this section.

(b) Funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be accounted for separately and shall be expended only to provide the supportive services enumerated in subdivision (b) of Section 54746, to provide in-service training as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 54746, and for the expenditures enumerated in subdivision (d) of this section.

(c) Funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) shall be accounted for separately and shall be expended only to provide developmentally appropriate child care and development services pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 54746 and staff development of child development program staff pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 54746 for children of teen parents enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program for the purpose of promoting the children’s development comparable to age norms, access to health and preventive services, and enhanced school readiness.

(d) Funds generated pursuant to Section 2551.3, subdivision (b) of Section 54749.5, and this section shall be accounted for separately and shall be expended only to provide the services enumerated in Section 54746 and the following expenditures as defined by the California State School Accounting Manual:

(1) Expenditures defined as direct costs of instructional programs.

(2) Expenditures defined as documented direct support costs.

(3) Expenditures defined as allocated direct support costs.

(4) Expenditures for indirect charges.

(5) Expenditures defined as facility costs, including the costs of renting, leasing, lease-purchase, remodeling, or improving buildings.

(e) Indirect costs may not exceed the lesser of the approved indirect cost rate or 10 percent.

(f) Expenditures that represent contract payments to community-based organizations and other governmental agencies pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section 54745 for the operation of a Cal-SAFE program shall be included in the Cal-SAFE program account.

(g) To the extent permitted by federal law, any funding made available to a school district or county superintendent of schools is subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The program is open to all eligible pupils without regard to any pupil’s religious beliefs or any other factor related to religion.

(2) No religious instruction is included in the program.

(3) The space where the program is operated is not used in any manner to foster religion during the time used for operation of the program.

(h) A school district or county superintendent of schools implementing a Cal-SAFE program may establish a claims process to recover federal funds available for any services provided that are Medi-Cal eligible.

(i) For purposes of serving pupils enrolled in the Cal-SAFE program in a summer school program or enrolled in a school program operating more than 180 days, eligibility for child care services pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 54746 shall be determined by the parent’s hours of enrollment and shall be for only those hours necessary to further the completion of the parent’s educational program.

(j) To meet startup costs for the opening of child care and development sites, as defined in subdivision (ab) of Section 8208, and applicable regulations, a school district or county office of education may apply for a one-time 15-percent service level exemption within the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the purposes of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) for each site meeting the criteria set forth in subdivision (ab) of Section 8208. To the extent that Budget Act funding is insufficient to cover the full costs of Cal-SAFE child care, reimbursements to all participating programs shall be reduced on a pro rata basis. A school district or county office of education shall submit claims pursuant to this subdivision with other claims submitted pursuant to this section. Funding provided for startup costs shall be utilized for approvable startup costs enumerated in subdivision (a) of Section 8275.

(k) To meet costs for the renovation, repair, or improvement of an existing building to make the building suitable for licensure for child care and development services and for the purchase of new relocatable child care facilities for lease to school districts and contracting agencies that provide child care and development services, a school district or county office of education that provides child care pursuant to this article may apply for and receive funding pursuant to Section 8278.3.

(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the implementation of this article is contingent upon appropriations in the annual Budget Act for the purpose of its administration and evaluation by the department.

(m) Notwithstanding any other law, a charter school may apply for funding pursuant to this article and shall meet the requirements of this article to be eligible for funding pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 44.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

54749.5.

(a) County superintendents who operated pregnant minors programs in the 1979–80 fiscal year, or commenced operation during the 1996–97 fiscal year, shall continue to operate pregnant minors programs in the 1980–81 fiscal year, or the 1997–98 fiscal year, as appropriate, and each fiscal year thereafter, and school districts that increased their revenue limit in the 1981–82 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42241 shall continue to operate pregnant minors programs in subsequent fiscal years, unless the program is transferred to another local education agency, or unless the county superintendent or district superintendent demonstrates that programs and services for pregnant minors, such as continuation school, home instruction, or independent instruction, are available from other local education agencies in the county, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(b) Pregnant minors programs that continue to operate pursuant to subdivision (a) and that continue to operate as Cal-SAFE programs may continue to claim funding pursuant to Section 2551.3 for an amount of average daily attendance up to the amount certified at the 1998–99 annual apportionment for that program. Programs continuing under this section may enroll pupils above the level of average daily attendance certified at the 1998–99 annual apportionment, and that additional average daily attendance shall be eligible for funding pursuant to Section 54749 and provisions that apply to the educational program that the pupil attends.

(c) County offices of education that choose to retain their pregnant minor program revenue limit rather than convert to the Cal-SAFE revenue limit shall provide child care services from funds provided in their pregnant minor program revenue limit pursuant to Section 2551.3 for children of pupils comprising base year average daily attendance as certified at the 1998–99 annual apportionment. Growth funding for child care shall be equal to the proportionate share of child care funding for the specific agency’s program, determined by dividing the certified growth in pupil average daily attendance by the total certified average daily attendance.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as allowing a county superintendent to receive funding pursuant to Sections 2551.3 and 54749 for the same average daily attendance, or for average daily attendance generated by the same pupil on the same calendar day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1057, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: Previously, this section was conditionally amended and renumbered from 8901 by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1078, and amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Green Technology Partnership Academies [54750. - 54750.]

54750.

(a) Commencing with the 2009–10 school year, when funds become available for additional partnership academies within the total number of grants available for all partnership academies pursuant to Section 54691, the Superintendent shall issue grants for the establishment of partnership academies and shall give priority to the establishment of partnership academies dedicated to educating pupils in the emerging environmentally sound technologies until no less than one green technology partnership academy has been established in each of the nine economic regions established by the state. The academies may include, but are not limited to, technologies that educate pupils in the following areas:

(1) Energy audits that include a determination of energy savings.

(2) Retrofitting and weatherization activities that increase energy efficiency and conservation.

(3) Energy-efficient and water-efficient buildings.

(4) Retrofitting and installing energy-efficient household appliances, windows, doors, insulation, and lighting.

(5) Retrofitting and installing water and energy conservation technologies in existing homes, industrial buildings, and commercial and public buildings, to improve efficiency, including the use of energy and water management technologies and control systems.

(6) The design, construction, manufacture, sale, assembly, installation, and maintenance of energy-efficient technologies and renewable energy facilities, or the component parts of renewable energy technologies.

(7) Energy-efficient technologies or practices and renewable energy production, or the component parts of renewable energy plants and energy distribution, including energy storage; energy infrastructure, including transmission; transportation, including logistics; and water and wastewater, including water conservation.

(8) Performance and low-emission vehicle technology, automotive computer systems, mass transit fleet conversion, and the servicing and maintenance of those technologies.

(9) Pollution prevention and hazardous and solid waste reduction.

(10) Ocean, soil, or water conservation, or forestation strategies to mitigate climate change impacts.

(b) (1) The selection of school districts to establish the green technology partnership academies and the planning and development of the green technology partnership academies shall be conducted pursuant to the procedures and requirements established in Section 54691 for all partnership academies. The planning grants shall be made available for academies pursuant to this article from the total number of grants established pursuant to Section 54691.

(2) In the event a school district applies to convert an existing school program to a partnership academy and meets all the criteria for a partnership academy pursuant to Section 54692 and paragraph (3), the department, in coordination with the Superintendent, may provide that academy with first-year implementation funds, as appropriate.

(3) (A) In order to be eligible for funding pursuant to this article, the coursework and internship or preapprenticeship programs of the proposed academy shall focus on the use of environmentally sound technologies and practices. The proposed academy shall demonstrate this through its efforts to obtain input from environmental industry, utilities, and professional trade organizations.

(B) Staff development opportunities also shall be included in the academy plans to ensure that teaching staff has the opportunity to be educated in the use of emerging technologies and to become familiar with new materials and current practices in the field.

(c) The priority established in this section may be satisfied when the specified number of green technology partnership academies meeting the requirements of this article are funded by any of, or a combination of, funds appropriated for the establishment of partnership academies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 685, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.7. Goods Movement Partnership Academies [54760. - 54760.]

54760.

(a) Commencing with the 2009–10 school year, when funds become available for additional partnership academies within the total number of grants available for all partnership academies pursuant to Section 54691, the Superintendent shall issue grants for the establishment of partnership academies and shall give priority to the establishment of partnership academies dedicated to educating pupils in goods movement occupational areas, such as port and terminal operations, pollution prevention, performance and low-emission vehicle technology, transportation computer systems, fleet conversion, and the servicing and maintenance of those technologies, shipping, logistics, trucking, rail, air, and security, until no less than one goods movement partnership academy has been established in each of the four transportation corridors established by the state.

(b) (1) The selection of school districts to establish the goods movement partnership academies and the planning and development of the goods movement partnership academies shall be conducted pursuant to the procedures and requirements established in Section 54691 for all partnership academies. The planning grants shall be made available for academies pursuant to this article from the total number of grants established pursuant to Section 54691.

(2) In the event a school district applies to convert an existing school program to a partnership academy and meets all the criteria for a partnership academy pursuant to Section 54692 and paragraph (3), the department, in coordination with the Superintendent, may provide that academy with first-year implementation funds, as appropriate.

(3) (A) In order to be eligible for funding pursuant to this article, the coursework and internship or preapprenticeship programs of the proposed academy shall focus significant time on the use of emerging technologies and state-of-the-art equipment. The proposed academy shall demonstrate this through its efforts to obtain input from industry and professional trade organizations.

(B) Staff development opportunities also shall be included in the academy plans to ensure that teaching staff has the opportunity to be educated in the use of emerging technologies and to become familiar with new equipment and current practices in the field.

(c) The priority established in this section may be satisfied when the specified number of goods movement partnership academies meeting the requirements of this article are funded by any of, or a combination of, funds appropriated for the establishment of partnership academies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 685, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.   See same-numbered section in Article 9, as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 82.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Supplemental Grants [54760. - 54760.]

54760.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide equal educational opportunity for all children in California. To achieve this end, the Legislature hereby establishes supplemental grants to be allocated to school districts that are receiving less than average funding from existing state programs. It is the intent of the Legislature that supplemental grants be funded by appropriations in the Budget Act in each of the two fiscal years following the first fiscal year in which funds for these grants are appropriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 82, Sec. 24.   Effective June 30, 1989.   See same-numbered section in Article 7.7, as added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 685.   Note: A similar Section 54760 in former Article 9, as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 83, was repealed on Jan. 1, 2006, pursuant to former Section 54763.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. California Student Author Program [54800. - 54804.]

54800.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The trend of low-income youth struggling to become proficient in reading and writing is a narrative that is passed down from era to era.

(b) According to The Literacy Project, there are currently 45 million Americans who are functionally illiterate and unable to read above a 5th grade level. In California, 25 percent of the state’s 6 million pupils are unable to perform basic reading skills.

(c) According to the organization DoSomething.org, nearly 85 percent of the juveniles who face trial in the juvenile court system are functionally illiterate, proving that there is a close
 relationship between illiteracy and crime.

(d) Over half of California pupils failed to meet English standards based on Spring 2017 standardized test results, a performance that remained essentially flat compared to the previous year.

(e) About 49 percent of pupils statewide met or exceeded English standards on the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress in 2017, which is administered to public school pupils at certain grade levels each year. The same proportion of California pupils met English standards in 2016.

(f) For decades, generational illiteracy has hindered the careers, futures, and hopes of many pupils and their families.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 5.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

54801.

There is hereby established the California Student Author Program to accomplish all of the following for public schoolage children from extremely low-income communities:

(a) Improve English language skills.

(b) Improve academic performance.

(c) Build healthy relationships with the community.

(d) Equip participants with critical life skills.

(e) Promote positive life choices.

(f) Increase literacy, reading, and writing among program
 participants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 74.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

54802.

(a) Any organization that is a grant recipient pursuant to Section 54804 shall implement the literacy program described in this section in the 2019–20 and 2020–21 school years.

(b) A grant recipient shall provide the literacy program described in this section to public schoolage children who are eligible for free and reduced cost lunch.

(c) A grant recipient shall establish a student author program to provide the participants an opportunity to write, edit, and promote a short story or other forms of literature. A grant recipient should provide regular, sequential student author workshops that parallel or complement school calendars, such as quarterly, semester, or summer and vacation-intensive programs
 that include, but are not limited to, the following components:

(1) Writing and editing, including instruction in the skills necessary for creative writing.

(2) Publishing an anthology.

(3) Marketing, media, and community relations, including instruction in book brand development and entrepreneurship.

(4) Individual and group presentations.

(5) Community-based book signing events.

(d) Grant recipients are expected to implement programming that does all of the following:

(1) Fosters critical thinking in student authors.

(2) Teaches students to practice effective problem solving.

(3) Instructs students on creating an outline for their writing project.

(4) Teaches students to develop promotional and advertising tools.

(5) Provides students with an understanding of how to create a literary character and an engaging plot.

(e) A grant recipient shall collect and provide to the California State Library, on a reporting schedule set by the California State Library, any information sought by the library, including achieving the outcomes listed in Section 54801 and the reporting data described in Section 54803.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 75.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

54803.

(a) Not later than January 1, 2022, the California State Library shall report to the Legislature on the outcomes of the California Student Author Program. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The extent to which the project accomplished the outcomes described in Section 54801.

(2) Demographic data about program participants, disaggregated by race, gender, foster youth, and English learners.

(b) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on January 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government
 Code.

(2) The report prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 5.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

54804.

(a) (1) The California State Library shall provide grant awards for purposes of this article to nonprofit organizations, public libraries, and local educational entities that have demonstrated experience in providing similar literacy programs to children in extremely low-income communities.

(2) The California State Library shall select grant recipients for the California Student Author Program with the participation goal of at least 1,000 public schoolage students, cumulatively, over the course of the 2019–20 and 2020–21 school years.

(b) A grant recipient shall use the funds awarded pursuant to this article only for the purposes described in this article.

(c) The California State Library may use up to 3 percent of the funds appropriated for the purposes of this article for administrative costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 76.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 30. SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS [56000. - 56865.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [56000. - 56070.]



  ARTICLE 1. Intent [56000. - 56001.]

56000.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that all individuals with exceptional needs have a right to participate in free appropriate public education and special educational instruction and services for these persons are needed in order to ensure the right to an appropriate educational opportunity to meet their unique needs.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that special education is an integral part of the total public education system and provides education in a manner that promotes maximum interaction between children or youth with disabilities and children or youth who are not disabled, in a manner that is appropriate to the needs of both.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that special education provides a full continuum of program options, including instruction conducted in the classroom, in the home, in hospitals and institutions, and in other settings, and instruction in physical education, to meet the educational and service needs in the least restrictive environment.

 (d) It is the intent of the Legislature to unify and improve special education programs in California under the flexible program design of the Master Plan for Special Education. It is the further intent of the Legislature to ensure that all individuals with exceptional needs are provided their rights to appropriate programs and services which are designed to meet their unique needs under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

 (e) It is the further intent of the Legislature that this part does not abrogate any rights provided to individuals with exceptional needs and their parents or guardians under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.). It is also the intent of the Legislature that this part does not set a higher standard of educating individuals with exceptional needs than that established by Congress under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

 (f) It is the further intent of the Legislature that the Master Plan for Special Education provide an educational opportunity for individuals with exceptional needs that is equal to or better than that provided prior to the implementation of programs under this part, including, but not limited to, those provided to individuals previously served in a development center for handicapped pupils.

 (g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the restructuring of special education programs as set forth in the Master Plan for Special Education be implemented in accordance with this part by all districts and county offices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56000.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Pupils with low-incidence disabilities, as a group, make up less than 1 percent of the total statewide enrollment for kindergarten through grade 12.

(2) Pupils with low-incidence disabilities require highly specialized services, equipment, and materials.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that:

(1) Deafness involves the most basic of human needs—the ability to communicate with other human beings. Many hard-of-hearing and deaf children use an appropriate communication mode, sign language, which may be their primary language, while others express and receive language orally and aurally, with or without visual signs or cues. Still others, typically young hard-of-hearing and deaf children, lack any significant language skills. It is essential for the well-being and growth of hard-of-hearing and deaf children that educational programs recognize the unique nature of deafness and ensure that all hard-of-hearing and deaf children have appropriate, ongoing, and fully accessible educational opportunities.

(2) It is essential that hard-of-hearing and deaf children, like all children, have an education in which their unique communication mode is respected, utilized, and developed to an appropriate level of proficiency.

(3) It is essential that hard-of-hearing and deaf children have an education in which special education teachers, psychologists, speech therapists, assessors, administrators, and other special education personnel understand the unique nature of deafness and are specifically trained to work with hard-of-hearing and deaf pupils. It is essential that hard-of-hearing and deaf children have an education in which their special education teachers are proficient in the primary language mode of those children.

(4) It is essential that hard-of-hearing and deaf children, like all children, have an education with a sufficient number of language mode peers with whom they can communicate directly and who are of the same, or approximately the same, age and ability level.

(5) It is essential that hard-of-hearing and deaf children have an education in which their parents and, where appropriate, hard-of-hearing and deaf people are involved in determining the extent, content, and purpose of programs.

(6) Hard-of-hearing and deaf children would benefit from an education in which they are exposed to hard-of-hearing and deaf role models.

(7) It is essential that hard-of-hearing and deaf children, like all children, have programs in which they have direct and appropriate access to all components of the educational process, including, but not limited to, recess, lunch, and extracurricular social and athletic activities.

(8) It is essential that hard-of-hearing and deaf children, like all children, have programs in which their unique vocational needs are provided for, including appropriate research, curricula, programs, staff, and outreach.

(9) Each hard-of-hearing and deaf child should have a determination of the least restrictive educational environment that takes into consideration these legislative findings and declarations.

(10) Given their unique communication needs, hard-of-hearing and deaf children would benefit from the development and implementation of regional programs for children with low-incidence disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1994.   Implementation contingent upon funding, as prescribed by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1126.)
-------------------------------------------

56001.

It is the intent of the Legislature that special education programs provide all of the following:

(a) Each individual with exceptional needs is assured an education appropriate to his or her needs in publicly supported programs through completion of his or her prescribed course of study or until the time that he or she has met proficiency standards prescribed.

(b) Early educational opportunities shall be available to all children between the ages of three and five years who require special education and services.

(c) Early educational opportunities shall be made available to children younger than three years of age pursuant to Chapter 4.4 (commencing with Section 56425), appropriate sections of this part, and the California Early Intervention Services Act (Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code).

(d) Any child younger than three years of age, potentially eligible for special education, shall be afforded the protections provided pursuant to the California Early Intervention Services Act (Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code) and Section 1439 of Title 20 of the United States Code and implementing regulations.

(e) Each individual with exceptional needs shall have his or her educational goals, objectives, and special education and related services specified in a written individualized education program.

(f) Education programs are provided under an approved local plan for special education that sets forth the elements of the programs in accordance with this part. This plan for special education shall be developed cooperatively with input from the community advisory committee and appropriate representation from special and regular teachers and administrators selected by the groups they represent to ensure effective participation and communication.

(g) Individuals with exceptional needs are offered special assistance programs that promote maximum interaction with the general school population in a manner that is appropriate to the needs of both, taking into consideration, for hard-of-hearing or deaf children, the individual’s needs for a sufficient number of age and language mode peers and for special education teachers who are proficient in the individual’s primary language mode.

(h) Pupils are transferred out of special education programs when special education services are no longer needed.

(i) The unnecessary use of labels is avoided in providing special education and related services for individuals with exceptional needs.

(j) Procedures and materials for assessment and placement of individuals with exceptional needs shall be selected and administered so as not to be racially, culturally, or sexually discriminatory. No single assessment instrument shall be the sole criterion for determining the placement of a pupil. The procedures and materials for assessment and placement shall be in the individual’s mode of communication. Procedures and materials for use with pupils of limited-English proficiency, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 52163 and in paragraph (18) of Section 1401 of Title 20 of the United States Code, shall be in the individual’s native language, as defined in paragraph (20) of Section 1401 of Title 20 of the United States Code. All assessment materials and procedures shall be selected and administered pursuant to Section 56320.

(k) Educational programs are coordinated with other public and private agencies, including preschools, child development programs, nonpublic nonsectarian schools, regional occupational centers and programs, and postsecondary and adult programs for individuals with exceptional needs.

(l) Psychological and health services for individuals with exceptional needs shall be available to each schoolsite.

(m) Continuous evaluation of the effectiveness of these special education programs by the local educational agencies shall be made to ensure the highest quality educational offerings.

(n) Appropriate qualified staff are employed, consistent with credentialing requirements, to fulfill the responsibilities of the local plan and positive efforts are made to employ qualified disabled individuals.

(o) Regular and special education personnel are adequately prepared to provide educational instruction and services to individuals with exceptional needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 653, Sec. 2.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [56020. - 56035.]

56020.

As used in this part, the definitions prescribed by this article apply unless the context otherwise requires.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56020.5.
